Massachusetts, session 194th, H3569.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary the 
department of energy resources shall investigate and report on the development of advanced 
nuclear energy generation in the Commonwealth. 
(b) Said report shall include, but not be limited to: 
1. Impacts and opportunities for the Commonwealth as a result of public law 118–67, the 
so-called ADVANCE Act 
2. Safety and environmental considerations associated with siting, construction, and 
operation of advanced nuclear energy generation 
3. Economic impacts, including potential tax revenue, job creation during construction 
and operation of an advanced nuclear facility 

of 2 11  4. Opportunities to offset carbon emissions as a result of increased use of advanced 
nuclear energy generation 
5. Interconnection, transmission, distribution and other grid related considerations 
necessary for implementation of advanced nuclear energy generation 
(c) Said report shall be filed with the respective clerks of the House and Senate, and the 
House and Senate chairs of the Joint Committee on Telecommunications, Utilities, and Energy 
no later than December 31, 2026 
SECTION 2. The first sentence of section 105 of said chapter 239, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by striking out the following words:- commenced commercial operation before 
January 1, 2011.